Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2652.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52PRESCRIPTION DRUG COST CREDITS IN HEALTH INSURANCESec.5201. Scope of chapter.5202. Definitions.5203. Prescription drug cost credit requirement.5204. Exceptions.5205. Protections.5206. Submission process.5207. Notice.1234567891011121314151617 5208. Exemption.5209. Regulations.5210. Enforcement.§ 5201. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the crediting of out-of-pocket costs paid for prescription drugs toward health plan cost-sharing.§ 5202. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Cost-sharing." As follows:(1) The share of the health care costs covered by a health benefit plan that a covered person pays out-of-pocket.(2) The term includes deductibles, coinsurance, copayments and similar charges.(3) The term does not include premiums, balance billed amounts from an out-of-network health care provider or the cost of noncovered services except as specified in this chapter."Covered person." A policyholder, subscriber or other individual who is entitled to receive health care services under a health benefit plan."Generically equivalent drug." As defined in section 2 of the act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1163, No.259), known as the Generic Equivalent Drug Law."Health benefit plan." As defined in section 103 of the act of November 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, No.169), known as the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act.20260HB2652PN3707 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Health care provider." A person who is licensed, certified or otherwise regulated to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth."Health care services." Covered treatment, admission, procedure, medical supplies and equipment or other services, including behavioral health, prescribed or otherwise provided or proposed to be provided by a health care provider to a covered person for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a health condition, illness, injury or disease under the terms of a health benefit plan."Health insurer." As defined in section 103 of the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act."Health insurer client." As defined in section 103 of the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act."Interchangeable biological product." As defined in section 2 of the Generic Equivalent Drug Law."Out-of-network provider." A health care provider who does not contract with a health insurer client to provide health care services to a covered person under a health benefit plan."Pharmacy benefits manager." As defined in section 103 of the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act."Prescription drug." The term shall include:(1) A drug, a generically equivalent drug, a biological product or an interchangeable biological product, as those terms are defined in section 2 of the Generic Equivalent Drug Law, that is prescribed by a health care provider.(2) Insulin, insulin syringes and insulin needles."Prescription drug coverage administrator." A health benefit plan, health insurer or a pharmacy benefits manager that administers pharmacy benefits for a health insurer client.20260HB2652PN3707 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 5203. Prescription drug cost credit requirement.(a) Credits.--Except as provided in subsection (d), a prescription drug coverage administrator shall credit toward the covered person's in-network out-of-pocket maximum and other cost-sharing requirements an out-of-pocket expense that the covered person incurs by directly purchasing a prescription drug from a pharmacy or through a discount drug purchasing entity.(b) Application of credit.--The credit shall be applied to the covered person's in-network out-of-pocket maximum for the plan year in which the out-of-pocket expense is incurred and without regard to whether:(1) the pharmacy or discount drug purchasing entity has a contract or other arrangement with the prescription drug coverage administrator of the covered person's health benefit plan; or(2) the health benefit plan has a separate out-of-network cost-sharing requirement or no out-of-network benefit.(c) Proof of purchase requirement.--To receive credit for an out-of-pocket expense as described in subsection (a), the covered person shall submit proof of purchase to the prescription drug coverage administrator in accordance with section 5206 (relating to submission process).(d) Limitation.--A prescription drug coverage administrator may limit the amount of the credit of a covered person's out-of-pocket expense in accordance with subsection (a) to the lesser of:(1) The amount the covered person incurred.(2) The amount the covered person would have incurred if the covered person had obtained the same prescription drug in 20260HB2652PN3707 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the same plan year from an in-network pharmacy and under the terms of the covered person's health benefit plan.§ 5204. Exceptions.A prescription drug coverage administrator may decline to credit a covered person's out-of-pocket expense as required in section 5203 (relating to prescription drug cost credit requirement) if:(1) The covered person, or the covered person's provider on the covered person's behalf, does not do both of the following:(i) Provide proof of purchase as required in sections 5203(b) and 5206 (relating to submission process).(ii) Comply with the prescription drug coverage administrator's utilization management processes, including prior authorization and step therapy protocols required under the covered person's health benefit plan.(2) The prescription drug is not covered under the formulary of the covered person's health benefit plan, and no drug exception has been granted.(3) The prescription drug is experimental, investigational or unsafe for the covered person.(4) The prescription drug coverage administrator is engaged in a reasonable investigation for, or has made a finding of, fraud, waste or abuse with respect to the prescribing health care professional or the covered person.§ 5205. Protections.Nothing in this chapter shall require a health benefit plan to credit the cost share of a prescription drug in derogation of a policyholder's constitutional protections of religious freedom 20260HB2652PN3707 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under:(1) The act of December 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, No.214), known as the Religious Freedom Protection Act.(2) 42 U.S.C. Ch. 21B (relating to religious freedom restoration).§ 5206. Submission process.(a) Process required.--A prescription drug coverage administrator shall establish a streamlined process for a covered person to submit a request for credit of the covered person's payment for a prescription drug to the covered person's contribution to a cost-sharing requirement under a health benefit plan.(b) Process requirements.--The submission process:(1) Shall be described in a manner that complies with the language requirements of 42 U.S.C. §§ 18031(e)(3)(B) (relating to affordable choices of health benefits plans) and 18116 (relating to nondiscrimination) and their regulations, including 45 CFR Subt. A Subch. A Pt. 92 (relating to nondiscrimination in health programs or activities) and Subch. B Pts. 149 (relating to surprise billing and transparency requirements), 155 (relating to exchange establishment standards and other related standards under the Affordable Care Act) and 156 (relating to health insurance issuer standards under the Affordable Care Act, including standards related to exchanges).(2) Shall be available at a minimum both in the covered person's health benefit plan and on the health insurer's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Shall permit submission both through electronic means and by mail.20260HB2652PN3707 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) May require submission of satisfactory proof of purchase, including evidence of the purchase date and amount and the identification of the prescription drug purchased. Examples of satisfactory proof of purchase include a dated and itemized receipt or a pharmacy record.(5) May require that the covered person submit proof of purchase no later than 90 days after the purchase.(6) Must be operational by no later than 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.§ 5207. Notice.(a) Maximum out-of-pocket.--Within 10 business days of becoming aware that a covered person reached the person's in-network maximum out-of-pocket limit, a prescription drug coverage administrator shall notify the covered person that the covered person's health benefit plan will pay 100% of covered costs for the remainder of the year at an in-network pharmacy and that reimbursement for out-of-pocket purchases of covered drugs will not be paid to the covered person.(b) Limitation.--Nothing in this chapter shall require a prescription drug coverage administrator to make payment to a covered person to reimburse an out-of-pocket purchase of a prescription drug once the covered person's maximum out-of-pocket limit is reached.§ 5208. Exemption.(a) Exemption.--The requirements of this chapter shall not apply to a prescription drug coverage administrator that contracts or has an arrangement with a pharmacy or discount drug purchasing entity that makes available a transparent pricing model to covered persons, if the prescription drug coverage administrator makes available all drugs covered under the terms 20260HB2652PN3707 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the covered person's health benefit plan that are offered from that pharmacy or discount drug purchasing entity as part of the contract or arrangement with the health benefit plan.(B) LOSS OF EXEMPTION.--A PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE ADMINISTRATOR THAT NO LONGER QUALIFIES FOR THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS CHAPTER WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE ADMINISTRATOR FAILS TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR THE EXEMPTION, WHICH MAY BE EXTENDED AT THE DISCRETION OF THE COMMISSIONER.(b) (C) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Transparent pricing model." A pricing arrangement made available to a covered person, directly or through a pharmacy benefits manager, pharmacy network or other contracted entity, that meets all of the following requirements:(1) The price for a prescription drug is both:(i) Disclosed to the covered person in advance of purchase.(ii) Based on a clearly defined formula or methodology, including a cost-plus, fixed markup or similar methodology, that is not contingent on post-sale rebates, retrospective adjustments or other undisclosed financial considerations.(2) The covered person is able to purchase the prescription drug at the disclosed price.(3) Any applicable fees, markups or dispensing charges are identifiable to the covered person in advance of purchase.20260HB2652PN3707 - 8 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 5209. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.§ 5210. Enforcement.(a) Penalties.--After satisfactory evidence of the violation of this chapter by a prescription drug coverage administrator, one or more of the following penalties may be imposed at the commissioner's discretion:(1) Suspension or revocation of the offending entity's license or registration.(2) Refusal, for a period not to exceed one year, to issue a new license or registration to the offending entity.(3) A fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation of this chapter.(4) A fine of not more than $10,000 for each willful violation of this chapter.(b) Limitation.--Fines imposed against an entity under this section may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Additional remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including:(1) The act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. A violation of this chapter shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(2) The act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act.20260HB2652PN3707 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The act of June 25, 1997 (P.L.295, No.29), known as the Pennsylvania Health Care Insurance Portability Act.(4) The act of November 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, No.169), known as the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act.(d) Administrative procedure.--The administrative provisions of this chapter shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies). A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health benefit plans for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the department, the addition of 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 52 shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health benefit plans for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the department, the addition of 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 52 shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2652PN3707 - 10 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223